Utah statutes.
61-6-5.   Issuing public corporation defined.
(1)  As used in this chapter, "issuing public corporation" means a
corporation, other than a depository institution, that is organized under the
laws of this state and that has:
(a)  100 or more shareholders;
(b)  its principal place of business, its principal office, or substantial
assets within the state; and
(c) (i)  more than 10% of its shareholders resident in the state;
(ii)  more than 10% of its shares owned by Utah residents; or
(iii)  10,000 shareholders resident in the state.
(2)  The residence of a shareholder is presumed to be the address appearing in
the records of the corporation.
(3)  Shares held by banks or other depository institutions (except as trustee
or guardian), brokers, or nominees shall be disregarded for purposes of
calculating the percentages or numbers described in this section.
(4)  As used in this chapter, "depository institution" means a depository
institution or a depository institution holding company as defined in Section
7-1-103.
(5)  A nonprofit corporation as defined in Section 16-6a-102 is not considered
to be an issuing public corporation for purposes of this chapter.
